Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-484
Producer, supplier, distributor, wholesaler, importer, or exporter; license required.

Before engaging in business as a producer, supplier, distributor, wholesaler, importer, or exporter, a person shall procure a license from the department permitting him or her to transact such business within the State of Nebraska. After reviewing the application required in section 66-483, the department may issue a license as provided in this section.

Laws 1925, c. 172, § 3, p. 449;

Laws 1929, c. 149, § 2, p. 521;

C.S.1929, § 66-403;

Laws 1931, c. 114, § 1, p. 333;

Laws 1933, c. 106, § 2, p. 434;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 66-403;

R.S.1943, § 66-403;

Laws 1969, c. 528, § 1, p. 2160;

Laws 1973, LB 528, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 360, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 66-403;

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 11;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 57;

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 7.

Increase in tax does not relieve sureties from obligation on bond. State v. Smith, 135 Neb. 423, 281 N.W. 851 (1938).